Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5141.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 31-3 of the General Laws entitled "Registration of Vehicles" is
hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-3-130. Registration plate to honor Governor Roger Williams.
(a) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles is empowered to make available a
motor vehicle registration plate commemorating Governor Roger Williams as the first governor of
what became the State of Rhode Island. The plate shall bear the designation “Gov. Roger Williams”
and a design provided by the division, and shall bear the seal of the state imprinted on it. The plate
shall be displayed upon the same registration number assigned to the vehicle for which it was issued
and shall be used in place of and in the same manner as the original registration plates issued to the
vehicle. The original registration plates for the vehicle shall be removed from the vehicle and the
registration certificate for the plates shall be carried in the vehicle, in accordance with § 31-3-9.
The registration certificate shall be in effect for the plate.
(b) An automobile or commercial commemorative Governor Roger Williams plate shall be
issued upon application using forms furnished by the administrator upon payment in addition to the
regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee.
(c) In addition to the regular prescribed motor vehicle registration fee, the Governor Roger
Williams plates shall be subject to payment of a service charge of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) and
a transfer charge of five dollars ($5.00) for the plate, of which fifteen dollars ($15.00) shall be
deposited to the division of motor vehicles for its costs in manufacturing and distributing the plates,

and the remainder shall be deposited into the general fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000328
========
LC000328 - Page 2 of 3